North Carolina, session 2025, HB613.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. AUTHORIZE VEHICLE OWNERS TO ELECT MONTH OF REGISTRATION
RENEWAL
SECTION 1.(a) This act shall be known as "The Vehicle Registration Convenience
Act."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 20-66 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-66. Renewal of vehicle registration.
(a) Annual Renewal. – When a vehicle registration is initially issued with a plate that is
not a calendar-year plate, the owner shall elect a month within 12 months of issuance upon which
the vehicle's registration expires. The initial period of registration expires at midnight on the last
day of the month elected by the owner. The registration of a vehicle must otherwise be renewed
annually.
(a1) Initial Registration Fee. – The fee for an initial period of registration elected by the
owner pursuant to subsection (a) of this section that is less than a year in duration is one-twelfth
of the annual fee provided in Part 7 of this Article multiplied by the number of full months in the
period beginning with the first full month following the month of issuance until the date the
registration expires, rounded to the nearest dollar.
(a2) Notice. – In accordance with G.S. 105-330.5(b), upon receiving written consent from
the owner of the vehicle, the Division may send to an email address provided by the owner of the
vehicle any required notice of renewal electronically to an e-mail address provided by the owner
of the vehicle.renewal.
(a3) Renewal Application. – To renew the registration of a vehicle, the owner of the
vehicle must file an application with the Division and pay the required registration fee. The owner
of a vehicle registered in North Carolina may renew that vehicle registration by mail. The
Division may receive and grant an application for renewal of registration at any time before the
registration expires.
…."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 20-52 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-52. Application for registration and certificate of title.
(a) An owner of a vehicle subject to registration must apply to the Division for a
certificate of title, a registration plate, and a registration card for the vehicle. To apply, an owner
*H613-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
must complete an application provided by the Division. The application shall contain a preprinted
option that co-owners may use to title the vehicle as a joint tenancy with right of survivorship.
The co-owners' designation of a joint tenancy with right of survivorship on the application shall
be valid notwithstanding whether this designation appears on the assignment of title. The
application must request all of the following information and may request other information the
Division considers necessary:
…
(8) A statement indicating the month of registration renewal the owner elects
under G.S. 20-66(a).
…."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 105-330.5(a1) reads as rewritten:
"(a1) Proration. – When a new registration is obtained for a registered classified motor
vehicle that is registered under the annual system, the taxes are prorated for the remainder of the
calendar year. The amount of prorated taxes due is the product of the proration fraction and the
taxes computed according to subsection (a) of this section. The numerator of the proration
fraction is the number of full months remaining in the calendar year following the registration
application date and the denominator of the fraction is 12. When a new registration is obtained
for a registered classified motor vehicle, and the owner elects an initial period of registration that
is less than a year in duration under G.S. 20-66(a), the taxes are prorated for the initial period of
registration. The amount of prorated taxes due is the product of the proration fraction and the
taxes computed according to subsection (a) of this section. The numerator of the proration
fraction is the number of full months in the initial period of registration and the denominator of
the fraction is 12."

PART II. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective January 1, 2026, and applies to applications
for vehicle registrations on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 613-Second Edition